California statutes. Public Resources Code
 shall accept donations of used equipment, including computers, printers, and lab equipment, for distribution to governmental entities and community-based nonprofit environmental organizations located within the California-Baja California border region and postsecondary educational institutions located within Baja California and within the California-Baja California border region, if the donations can be shown to contribute to the protection of the environment, public health, or natural resources of the California border region.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 668, Sec. 6.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Provisions applicable as prescribed in Section 71104.)
-------------------------------------------

71103.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The New River poses an imminent and severe threat to the public health of residents of Calexico, California, and adjacent communities in Imperial County. Since the 1940s, the New River has been recognized as a significant pollution and human health problem, primarily because of extremely high concentrations of fecal coliform bacteria.

(2) While there have been recent measurable water quality improvements as a result of sewage infrastructure projects implemented and completed during the last 10 years in Mexicali, Mexico, the residual and projected pollution in the New River coming from Mexico remains a significant threat to public health
 and the environment.

(3) Current bacteria levels in the New River are several orders of magnitude above the state standards for bacteria. Based on these levels and the historic levels of pollution, the waterway is believed to carry pathogens that cause tuberculosis, encephalitis, polio, cholera, hepatitis, and typhoid. The waterway also carries other contaminants in concentrations that are in violation of federal, state, and Mexican water quality standards by several hundredfold.

(4) The New River is listed as an impaired river by the United States Environmental Protection Agency due to low dissolved oxygen (DO) and the presence of chlordane, chlorpyrifos, copper, dichloro-diphenyl-trichloroethane (DDT), diazinon, dieldrin, mercury, nutrients, pathogens, polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs), sediment, selenium, toxaphene, toxicity, trash, and volatile organic compounds (VOCs).

(5) The New River is a major contributor of pollution to the Salton Sea, and failure to address water quality problems in the New River is impeding the ability of the state to implement laws and programs designed to restore and protect this important environmental and wildlife habitat resource.

(6) The New River condition in the border area is also an aesthetic nuisance for Calexico residents and has historically inhibited the city’s socioeconomic well-being and growth.

(7) A coordinated and comprehensive state strategy is needed to deal with the residual and projected pollution so that the New River and associated river channel can be enhanced to a condition that will allow the residents of Calexico and Imperial County to utilize them as recreational and natural assets as contemplated in the California River Parkways
 Act of 2004 (Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5750) of Division 5).

(8) In the Budget Act of 2009, as amended by Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 2009 Fourth Extraordinary Session, eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) was appropriated to the City of Calexico for various planning needs necessary to develop a river parkway plan and river improvement project for the New River. The moneys were appropriated in order to secure and serve as matching funds for the four million dollars ($4,000,000) allocated pursuant to the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users (Public Law 109-59) to the City of Calexico for the development of bicycle paths and public park space adjacent to the New River.

(9) The City of Calexico, as the recipient of funding pursuant to the California River Parkways Act of 2004, has agreed to provide necessary financial
 support to the council for the development of the council’s strategic plan.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(2) “City” means the City of Calexico, California.

(3) “Council” means the California-Mexico Border Relations Council established pursuant to Section 99522 of the Government Code.

(4) “County” means the County of Imperial, California.

(5) “IBWC” means the International Boundary and Water Commission, United States Section.

(6) “New River
 Improvement Project” or “project” means a project to study, monitor, remediate, and enhance New River water quality in the County of Imperial to protect human health, and develop a river parkway suitable for public use and enjoyment.

(c) Pursuant to the authority granted to the council pursuant to Section 99523 of the Government Code and contingent upon the execution of an agreement with the City of Calexico for the purpose of providing the necessary funding, the council shall develop a strategic plan to guide the implementation of the New River Improvement Project. The strategic plan shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(1) Quantification of current and projected New River water quality impairments and their threat to public health.

(2) Prioritization of the actions necessary to
 protect public health and to meet New River water quality objectives and other environmental goals, such as improving the quality of waterflows into the Salton Sea.

(3) Identification of potential funds for the implementation of the project, and potential lead agencies that would be responsible for environmental review of activities related to the cleanup and restoration of the New River.

(4) Identification of the appropriate federal, state, and local agencies with a role in implementing and achieving the New River Improvement Project.

(d) (1) To the extent permitted by law, the council may work with appropriate binational, federal, state, local, and nongovernmental organizations on both sides of the California-Mexico border to develop the strategic plan and to fund and establish cooperative
 water quality monitoring, public health studies, inspection, and technical assistance programs as needed to support, convene, and oversee the project.

(2) To further the objectives of this subdivision, the council may convene and oversee a technical advisory committee. The advisory committee shall advise the council regarding the necessary studies and activities to carry out the project, and shall serve at the pleasure of the council. The advisory committee shall include representatives from the following:

(A) Impacted cities and counties.

(B) Relevant local, regional, and state agencies and departments.

(C) Nongovernmental organizations.

(D) Other stakeholders deemed necessary by the
 council.

(3) The council shall appoint the chair of the committee and may expand the membership and expertise of the committee as it deems necessary.

(4) The council may enter into an agreement, including an interagency agreement and memorandum of understanding, with public agencies, including the city, to accept, manage, and expend funds for the implementation of this section.

(e) This section does not modify existing roles, responsibilities, or liabilities of the State of California, the City of Calexico, Imperial County, or any other governmental agency, under those laws that regulate, protect, and clean up surface waters entering the United States from Mexico.

(f) The New River Improvement Project Account is hereby created in the California Border
 Environmental and Public Health Protection Fund to receive moneys for activities related to the New River Improvement Project from sources identified in Section 71101 and other sources. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the account shall be expended to implement the purposes identified in subdivision (c) or Section 71102 that are related to the New River.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 261.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Provisions applicable as prescribed in Section 71104.)
-------------------------------------------

71103.6.

(a) The council shall establish the New River Water Quality, Public Health, and River Parkway Development Program to coordinate funding for, and the implementation of, the recommendations from the strategic plan developed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 71103.5, and the projects identified pursuant to Section 71102.

(b) Any entity of state government that funds the activities of the program shall make all necessary efforts to integrate and align its contractual and administrative requirements for grants, loans, and other forms of financial support to meet the goals of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 668, Sec. 8.   (AB 965)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Provisions applicable as prescribed in Section 71104.)
-------------------------------------------

71104.

This part shall only be operative during those fiscal years for which funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act to implement this part, or are made available from contributions or donations from the sources identified in Section 71101. The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall inform the Secretary of State when funds are made available from contributions or donations from the sources identified in Section 71101.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section provides for operation of Part 2.5, commencing with Section 71100, in fiscal years for which funds are provided.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.6. Tijuana River Valley Watershed Action Plan [71107. - 71107.]

71107.

(a) Upon an appropriation of funds from the Legislature for this purpose, the California Environmental Protection Agency and the Natural Resources Agency, including their subsidiary agencies, shall collaborate to create a Tijuana River Valley Watershed Action Plan, known as the Tijuana River Plan. The Tijuana River Plan shall be drawn from existing and ongoing watershed planning efforts in both the United States and Mexico. The Tijuana River Plan shall be reviewed and updated on a three-year cycle. The Tijuana River Plan shall include, to the extent practicable, all of the following:

(1) Identification of key stakeholders and partnerships for data collection and information sharing.

(2) Identification of issues of concern and potential projects that may be implemented in the Tijuana River Valley watershed in both the United States and Mexico.

(3) Identification of short-term and long-term goals and targets for projects that may be implemented through the plan.

(4) Methods and strategies to restore water quality or water supply in degraded areas and to protect overall watershed health.

(5) Methods and strategies to protect the public health and limit beach closures.

(6) Methods and strategies, including target dates or milestones, interagency or public/private partnerships, and binational collaboration, to ensure implementation of the plan in Mexico and the United States, to the extent feasible.

(b) Upon completion of the Tijuana River Plan described in subdivision (a), the California Environmental Protection Agency and the Natural Resources Agency shall consult with the governments for the United States, the County of San Diego, the City of San Diego, the City of Imperial Beach, Mexico, the State of Baja California, the City of Tijuana, and the City of Tecate to develop a common watershed action plan to address issues in the Tijuana River and its entire watershed, on both sides of the border, including, but not limited to, issues relating to water quality, wildlife and fishery habitat, stormwater management, riverside development and management, wastewater discharge, and water supply.

(c) This section shall not require the expenditure of state funding or the development of any specific project without an appropriation from the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE [71110. - 71118.]

71110.

The California Environmental Protection Agency, in designing its mission for programs, policies, and standards, shall do all of the following:

(a) Conduct its programs, policies, and activities that substantially affect human health or the environment in a manner that ensures the fair treatment of people of all races, cultures, and income levels, including minority populations and low-income populations of the state.

(b) Promote enforcement of all health and environmental statutes within its jurisdiction in a manner that ensures the fair treatment of people of all races, cultures, and income levels, including minority populations and low-income populations in the state.

(c) Ensure greater public participation in the agency’s development, adoption, and implementation of environmental regulations and policies.

(d) Improve research and data collection for programs within the agency relating to the health of, and environment of, people of all races, cultures, and income levels, including minority populations and low-income populations of the state.

(e) Coordinate its efforts and share information with the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(f) Identify differential patterns of consumption of natural resources among people of different socioeconomic classifications for programs within the agency.

(g) Consult with and review any information received from the Working Group on Environmental Justice established to assist the California Environmental Protection Agency in developing an agencywide strategy pursuant to Section 71113 that meets the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 72000 by Stats. 2001, Ch. 765, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

71111.

On or before January 1, 2001, the California Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a model environmental justice mission statement for boards, departments, and offices within the agency. For purposes of this section, environmental justice has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 65040.12 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1109, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71112.

In developing the model environmental justice mission statement pursuant to Section 71111, the California Environmental Protection Agency shall consult with, review, and evaluate any information received from the Working Group on Environmental Justice established pursuant to Section 71113.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 72001.5 by Stats. 2001, Ch. 765, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

71113.

(a) On or before January 1, 2002, the Secretary for Environmental Protection shall convene a Working Group on Environmental Justice to assist the California Environmental Protection Agency in developing, on or before July 1, 2002, an agencywide strategy for identifying and addressing any gaps in existing programs, policies, or activities that may impede the achievement of environmental justice.

(b) The working group shall be composed of the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Chairs of the State Air Resources Board, the California Integrated Waste Management Board, and the State Water Resources Control Board, the Director of Toxic Substances Control, the Director of Pesticide Regulation, the Director of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, and the Director of Planning and Research.

(c) The working group shall do all of the following on or before April 1, 2002:

(1) Examine existing data and studies on environmental justice, and consult with state, federal, and local agencies and affected communities.

(2) Recommend criteria to the Secretary for Environmental Protection for identifying and addressing any gaps in existing programs, policies, or activities that may impede the achievement of environmental justice.

(3) Recommend procedures and provide guidance to the California Environmental Protection Agency for the coordination and implementation of intraagency environmental justice strategies.

(4) Recommend procedures for collecting, maintaining, analyzing, and coordinating information relating to an environmental justice strategy.

(5) Recommend procedures to ensure that public documents, notices, and public hearings relating to human health or the environment are concise, understandable, and readily accessible to the public. The recommendation shall include guidance for determining when it is appropriate for the California Environmental Protection Agency to translate crucial public documents, notices, and hearings relating to human health or the environment for limited-English-speaking populations.

(6) Hold public meetings to receive and respond to public comments regarding recommendations required pursuant to this section, prior to the finalization of the recommendations. The California Environmental Protection Agency shall provide public notice of the availability of draft recommendations at least one month prior to the public meetings.

(7) Make recommendations on other matters needed to assist the agency in developing an intraagency environmental justice strategy.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 72002 by Stats. 2001, Ch. 765, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

71114.

(a) The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall, on or before January 1, 2002, convene an advisory group to assist the working group described in Section 71113 by providing recommendations and information to, and serving as a resource for, the working group. The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall appoint members to the advisory group according to the following categories:

(1) Two representatives of local or regional land use planning agencies.

(2) Two representatives from air pollution control districts or air quality management districts.

(3) Two representatives from certified unified program agencies (CUPAs).

(4) Two representatives from environmental organizations.

(5) Four representatives from the business community, two from a small business and two from a large business, except that three of these representatives may be from an association that represents small or large businesses, and at least one of the small business representatives shall be from an association that represents small businesses. As used in this paragraph, “small business” has the meaning given that term by subdivision (c) of Section 1028.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and a large business is any business other than a small business.

(6) Two representatives from community organizations.

(7) One representative from a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(8) Two representatives from environmental justice organizations.

(b) The advisory group may form subcommittees to address specific types of environmental program areas. The California Environmental Protection Agency shall provide a reasonable per diem for attendance at advisory committee meetings by advisory committee members from nonprofit organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1003, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71114.1.

After the California Environmental Protection Agency develops the strategy pursuant to Section 71113 and before December 31, 2003, each board, department, and office within the agency shall, in coordination with the Secretary for Environmental Protection and the Director of the Office of Planning and Research, review its programs, policies, and activities and identify and address any gaps in its existing programs, policies, or activities that may impede the achievement of environmental justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 765, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

71115.

The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall, not later than January 1, 2004, and every three years thereafter, prepare and submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report on the implementation of this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 72004 by Stats. 2001, Ch. 765, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

71116.

(a) The Environmental Justice Small Grant Program is hereby established under the jurisdiction of the California Environmental Protection Agency. The California Environmental Protection Agency shall adopt regulations for the implementation of this section. These regulations shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Specific criteria and procedures for the implementation of the program.

(2) A requirement that each grant recipient submit a written report to the agency documenting its expenditures of the grant funds and the results of the funded project.

(3) Provisions promoting the equitable distribution of grant
 funds in a variety of areas throughout the state, with the goal of making grants available to organizations that will attempt to address environmental justice issues.

(b) The purpose of the program is to provide grants to eligible community groups, including, but not limited to, community-based, grassroots nonprofit organizations, that are located in areas adversely affected by environmental pollution and hazards and that are involved in work to address environmental justice issues.

(c) (1) Both of the following are eligible to receive moneys from the fund:

(A) A nonprofit entity.

(B) A federally recognized tribal government.

(2) For purposes of this section, “nonprofit entity” means any corporation, trust, association, cooperative, or other organization that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is operated primarily for scientific, educational, service, charitable, or other similar purposes in the public interest.

(B) Is not organized primarily for profit.

(C) Uses its net proceeds to maintain, improve, or expand, or any combination thereof, its operations.

(D) Is a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or is able to provide evidence to the agency that the state recognizes
 the organization as a nonprofit entity.

(3) For purposes of this section, “nonprofit entity” specifically excludes an organization that is a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(4) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(d) Individuals may not receive grant moneys from the fund.

(e) Grant recipients shall use the grant award to fund only the project described in the recipient’s application. Recipients shall not use the grant funding to shift moneys from existing or proposed projects to activities for which grant funding is prohibited under subdivision (g).

(f) Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis for projects that are based in communities
 with the most significant exposure to pollution. Grants shall be limited to any of the following purposes and no other:

(1) Resolve environmental problems through distribution of information.

(2) Identify improvements in communication and coordination among agencies and stakeholders in order to address the most significant exposure to pollution.

(3) Expand the understanding of a community about the environmental issues that affect their community.

(4) Develop guidance on the relative significance of various environmental risks.

(5) Promote community involvement in the decisionmaking process
 that affects the environment of the community.

(6) Present environmental data for the purposes of enhancing community understanding of environmental information systems and environmental information.

(g) (1) The agency shall not award grants for, and grant funding shall not be used for, any of the following:

(A) Other state grant programs.

(B) Lobbying or advocacy activities relating to any federal, state, regional, or local legislative, quasi-legislative, adjudicatory, or quasi-judicial proceeding involving development or adoption of statutes, guidelines, rules, regulations, plans or any other governmental proposal, or involving decisions
 concerning siting, permitting, licensing, or any other governmental action.

(C) Litigation, administrative challenges, enforcement action, or any type of adjudicatory proceeding.

(D) Funding of a lawsuit against any governmental entity.

(E) Funding of a lawsuit against a business or a project owned by a business.

(F) Matching state or federal funding.

(G) Performance of any technical assessment for purposes of opposing or contradicting a technical assessment prepared by a public agency.

(2) An organization’s use of funds from a grant
 awarded under this section to educate a community regarding an environmental justice issue or a governmental process does not preclude that organization from subsequent lobbying or advocacy concerning that same issue or governmental process, as long as the lobbying or advocacy is not funded by a grant awarded under this section.

(h) The agency shall review, evaluate, and select grant recipients, and screen grant applications to ensure that they meet the requirements of this section.

(i) The maximum amount of a grant provided pursuant to this section may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(j) For purposes of this section, “environmental justice” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65040.12 of the
 Government Code.

(k) (1) The Secretary for Environmental Protection may expend up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) per year for the purposes of this section.

(2) (A) Of the amount described in paragraph (1), up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be expended by the Secretary for Environmental Protection for grants to organizations working to address and mitigate the effects of sea level rise in disadvantaged communities impacted by sea level rise.

(B) For purposes of this section, “disadvantaged community” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 71118.

(l) Board, departments, and offices
 within the California Environmental Protection Agency may allocate funds from various special funds, settlements, and penalties to implement this program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 6.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

71118.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(2) “Disadvantaged community” means a community identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Supplemental environmental project” means an environmentally beneficial project that a person subject to an enforcement action voluntarily agrees to undertake in settlement of the action and to offset a portion of a civil penalty.

(b) Each board, department, and office within the agency that has enforcement authority shall establish a policy on supplemental environmental projects that benefits disadvantaged communities. The policy shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following: 

(1) A public process to solicit potential supplemental environmental projects from disadvantaged communities.

(2) Allowing the amount of a supplemental environmental project to be up to 50 percent of the enforcement action brought under the jurisdiction of a board, department, or office within the agency.

(3) An
 annual list of supplemental environmental projects that may be selected to settle a portion of an enforcement action under the jurisdiction of a board, department, or office within the agency.

(4) A consideration of the relationship between the location of the violation and the location of the proposed supplemental environmental project.

(c) The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall consolidate the projects compiled pursuant to subdivision (b) into one list and post that list on the agency’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 585, Sec. 2.   (AB 1071)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.5. CALIFORNIA ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY CONSOLIDATION [71120. - 71126.]

71120.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions govern this part:

(a) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(b) “Secretary” means the Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 17.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71121.

(a) In the 2004–05 fiscal year, to the extent that it will achieve actual budget savings and to the extent authorized by existing law, the secretary shall consolidate the number of accounts and funds in the Treasury that are for the support of programs administered by the boards, departments, and offices within the agency.

(b) The secretary shall request the Governor to reflect the consolidation of funds in the proposed Governor’s budget for fiscal year 2005–06.

(c) Nothing in this section authorizes a change in purpose, revenue, management, allocation, or expenditure, related to a program supported by a special fund, or the manner or means of collecting revenue that is deposited in a special fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 17.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71122.

In the 2004–05 fiscal year, to the extent that it will achieve actual budget savings, the secretary shall consolidate the following non-policy functions that are common among the boards, departments, and offices within the agency:

(a) Information technology.

(b) Collecting fees.

(c) Procuring basic office supplies and equipment.

(d) The generic human resources functions that support state personnel, including health and safety programs, employee training, recruitment and exams for common civil service classifications, equal opportunity officers, transportation related services and programs, mail, reproduction, shipping, and receiving.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 17.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71123.

(a) The implementation of Sections 71121 and 71122 shall not affect the independence of a board, department, or office within the agency to administer its own budget or to manage its own employees, except for the specific activities consolidated by the secretary pursuant to those sections.

(b) The implementation of Sections 71121 and 71122 shall not affect the personnel of a board, department, or office within the agency, who are engaged in program work and related support functions such as contract administration and facilities management.

(c) The implementation of Sections 71121 and 71122 shall not result in the transfer of fee revenue from a board, department, or office within the agency, to another board, department, or office within the agency.

(d) Nothing in this part shall affect an executive reorganization pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 12080) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 17.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71124.

The secretary shall report any budget savings achieved pursuant to Sections 71121 and 71122 to the Legislature’s budget committees, for appropriation to programs that directly reduce air pollution or water pollution, or protect public health and the environment, if that appropriation complies with existing constraints on the use of the moneys saved.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 17.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71125.

The secretary may use a reimbursement from a board, department, or office within the agency for a consolidated service that the agency provides to those entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 17.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71126.

Upon the request of the secretary, the Department of Finance shall assist the secretary in complying with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 17.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.6. Regional Climate Collaborative Program [71130. - 71132.]

71130.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Capacity building” is the process of strengthening local coordination, leadership, knowledge, skills, expertise, and access to resources in under-resourced communities with the goal of helping to develop or increase the ability of that community to independently compete for grants and implement projects in the future. Capacity building activities include, but are not limited to, identifying and planning for needed climate change mitigation and adaptation
 projects in a given region and identifying the tools and resources needed to successfully access, apply for, and receive grant funding.

(b) “Collaborative” means a coordinated body of regional stakeholder groups that are located in, serve, and represent the needs of the under-resourced communities within that region and that provide capacity building to those under-resourced communities within its region to access statewide public and other grant moneys for climate change mitigation and adaptation projects that maximize the benefits for the region.

(c) “Council” means the Strategic Growth Council.

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit corporation qualified to do business in the state and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) “Stakeholder” includes, but is not limited to, community-based organizations, nonprofits, businesses, faith-based organizations, interested individuals, elected officials, and local government agencies.

(f) “Technical assistance” means the process of providing the necessary education and resources for climate change mitigation and adaptation projects for any of the following:

(1) Project development.

(2) Grant development and writing for state and federal grant programs.

(3) The successful and appropriate expenditure of grant moneys for the successful completion of climate
 change
 mitigation and adaptation projects.

(4) Post-application and project implementation assistance.

(g) “Under-resourced community” means a community identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code, or subdivision (g) of Section 75005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 377, Sec. 2.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

71131.

(a) A regional climate collaborative program is hereby established to be administered by the council to assist under-resourced communities within a region to access statewide public and other grant moneys.

(b) The council shall do all of the following in identifying eligible under-resourced communities and in selecting collaboratives: 

(1) Adopt program guidelines that establish criteria for the selection of communities eligible for assistance in developing a collaborative.
 The program guidelines shall prioritize statewide geographic diversity and shall consider the region’s proportion of under-resourced communities and the region’s previous success in receiving competitive state climate change mitigation and adaptation moneys.

(2) Post the guidelines outlining the criteria on the council’s Internet Web site and solicit public comment.

(3) Hold at least one public hearing before selecting a community.

(4) Allow at least three months between the solicitation announcement and the selection of a collaborative by the council.

(5) Perform at least three outreach activities between the solicitation announcement and the selection of a collaborative by the council to provide information and assistance to a potential collaborative. The outreach activities shall be made available using advanced forms of technology to the extent possible.

(6) Establish collaboratives a minimum of two times over the course of the program established pursuant to this section.

(c) After selecting communities for collaboratives, the council shall award annual grants as moneys are appropriated by the Legislature to the council for the purposes of this part.

(d) Eligible applicants for a collaborative include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Community-based organizations.

(2) Nonprofits and foundations.

(3) Small businesses.

(4) Local government agencies.

(5) Joint powers authorities.

(6) Tribal governments.

(7) Other organizations with a history of providing
 community-based outreach and technical assistance.

(e) Eligible applicants shall form a regional collaborative stakeholder structure and shall collectively submit one application based on a shared vision. With the application, the applicants shall collectively submit a memorandum of understanding that describes the governance and organization of the collaborative stakeholder structure.

(f) In selecting a collaborative, the council shall give priority to proposals that demonstrate strong and diverse partnerships, including with community-based organizations and other stakeholder groups.

(g) After being selected by the council, a collaborative shall provide capacity building services to assist in building the community-driven leadership, knowledge, skills, experience, and resources to identify and access public funding for climate change mitigation and adaptation projects within the under-resourced community. Where feasible, a collaborative shall leverage, complement, and build on existing regional efforts and resources for capacity building and technical assistance. Except if the council, in consultation with a collaborative, determines that an activity is unnecessary, a collaborative shall conduct at least all of the following activities for the region it serves:

(1) Conduct outreach
 and
 build awareness of competitive grant programs.

(2) Convene stakeholders to discuss community needs regarding potential climate change mitigation and adaptation projects eligible for statewide competitive grant programs with specific allocations for under-resourced communities.

(3) Develop community and project plans,
 including climate action plans, demonstrating local needs and identifying multiple-benefit projects for implementation.

(4) Support the development of partnerships between stakeholders and potential public and private funding sources.

(5) Provide policy, program, and technical advice to stakeholders to develop and align multibenefit projects with potential funding sources.

(6) Serve as an intermediary between community stakeholders and technical assistance programs within relevant agencies and coordinate scientific and technical support from outside experts.

(7) Coordinate and implement assistance and training to stakeholders in grant application development, project management, implementation, and monitoring.

(8) Assist in the development of local job training and anti-displacement programs and policies.

(h) Each collaborative shall select a managing stakeholder that can demonstrate the organizational capacity to complete projects and the financial capacity to receive and be accountable for moneys provided pursuant to this part. A managing stakeholder may include, but need not be limited to, a local government agency, community-based